src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-guosmak_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - guosmak: # N_ODD_WG (CGrad and umlaut)
    guosmak+N+Sg+Nom: guosmak
    guosmak+N+Sg+Gen: guassmaga
    guosmak+N+Sg+Acc: guassmagav
    guosmak+N+Sg+Ill: guassmagij
    guosmak+N+Sg+Ine: guassmagin
    guosmak+N+Sg+Ela: [guassmagist, guassmagis]
    guosmak+N+Sg+Com: guassmagijn
    guosmak+N+Pl+Nom: guassmaga
    guosmak+N+Pl+Gen: guassmagij
    guosmak+N+Pl+Acc: guassmagijt
    guosmak+N+Pl+Ill: guassmagijda
    guosmak+N+Pl+Ine: guassmagijn
    guosmak+N+Pl+Ela: [guassmagijst, guassmagijs]
    guosmak+N+Pl+Com: [guassmagij, guassmagijgum]
    guosmak+N+Ess: guassmagin
    guosmak+N+Abe: guassmagahtá

 
 
